Maine, session 132, LD1431.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §197 is enacted to read:
§197. Interstate voter registration cross-check program
1. Interstate voter registration cross-check program. The Secretary of State may
implement and maintain an interstate voter registration cross-check program, referred to in
this section as "the program," to identify a duplicate voter registration in more than one
state or jurisdiction. The program may cooperate with other states and jurisdictions to
develop a system, referred to in this section as "the system," to routinely exchange public
voter registration lists with other states and jurisdictions to compare voters and voter
histories.
2. Private sector data system. The Secretary of State may identify and contract with
a provider of a private sector data system that has a demonstrated ability to work with a
system to identify and match registered voters to support maintenance of voter registration
information under section 161, subsection 2-A.
3. Program reporting requirements. The Secretary of State shall record all
maintenance of voter registration conducted as a result of the program and the system use.
The Secretary of State shall submit the information recorded under this subsection to the
Legislature no later than the first day of each quarter of the fiscal year.
4. Voter data privacy protections. The Secretary of State may not record or disclose
information or personally identifying data in the program or the system that is not
accessible under section 196-A, including a voter's name, residence address, mailing
address, year of birth, enrollment status, electoral district, voter status, date of registration,
date of change of the voter record if applicable, voter participation history, voter record
number and any special designation indicating uniformed service voters, overseas voters
or township voters.
5. Contract for voter registration information. A contract for services to carry out
maintenance of voter registration under subsection 2 may not require any additional duty
of or any additional disclosure of data by the Secretary of State beyond what is required in
this section.
6. Cost of program and system. The cost to implement and maintain the program and
the system may not exceed the funds allocated to the Secretary of State for maintenance of
voter registration.
7. Compliance with federal law. The program must comply with the National Voter
Registration Act of 1993, 52 United States Code, sections 20501 to 20511 and the federal
Help America Vote Act of 2002, 52 United States Code, sections 20901 to 21145.